apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="towl__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mayd</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysmayd</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ley</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-shiu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pu/nt__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nt</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vot/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eym</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emayd</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eee</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eee</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eee</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eee</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eym</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eysmayd</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eys</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eys</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eys</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eys</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ein</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagh</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagh</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagh</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagh</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eagh</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e-shiu</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eit</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="yeeal"><i>yeeal</i><par n="towl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aayeeil"><par n="initial-a"/><i>ayeeil</i><par n="towl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prognose"><par n="initial-p"/><i>rognos</i><par n="vot/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vote"><i>vot</i><par n="vot/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rouail"><i>rouail</i><par n="towl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="punt"><par n="initial-p"/><i>u</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mooie-cheeayl"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ooie-cheeayl</i><par n="towl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="towl"><par n="initial-t"/><i>owl</i><par n="towl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stoke"><par n="initial-s"/><i>tok</i><par n="vot/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ard-voyl"><par n="initial-a"/><i>rd-voyl</i><par n="towl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="valse"><i>vals</i><par n="vot/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parse"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ars</i><par n="vot/e__vblex"/></e>
